Washington statutes.
RCW 2.42.170

Fee.

A qualified and/or intermediary interpreter appointed under this chapter is entitled to a reasonable fee for services, including waiting time and reimbursement for actual necessary travel expenses. The fee for services for interpreters for hearing impaired persons shall be in accordance with standards established by the department of social and health services, office of deaf services.

[ 1991 c 171 s 4; 1985 c 389 s 17.]